Wisconsin, session 2025, AB554.
do enact as follows:AB554,1Section 1. 97.50 of the statutes is created to read:97.50 Labeling food products that contain cultured animal cells or tissue. (1) In this section:(a) “Animal” means a mammal, a bird, a reptile, an amphibian, a fish, or a mollusk.(b) “Lab-grown meat” means cultured animal cells or cultured animal tissue derived from cultured animal cells.(2) No person may sell or offer for sale a packaged food product knowing that it contains lab-grown meat unless all of the following apply:(a) The packaged food product is labeled with the phrase “lab-grown meat” in type or lettering at least as large as any other type or lettering on the packaged food product’s label in a color of print that clearly contrasts with its background.(b) The packaged food product’s label includes a complete and accurate list of the ingredients contained in the enclosed food product. (c) If there is more than one separately packaged component enclosed in the packaged food product, each separately packaged component that contains lab-grown meat bears the phrase “lab-grown meat” in type or lettering not smaller than 20-point type.(3) No person may sell or offer for sale at a public eating place a food product, knowing that it contains lab-grown meat, as a substitute for meat unless such food product is ordered by the customer.(4) No person may serve a food product, knowing that it contains lab-grown meat, as a substitute for meat to students, patients, or inmates of any state institutions, except if ordered by the institution superintendent when necessary for the health of a specific patient or inmate, if directed by the physician in charge of the patient or inmate.(5) A person that violates this section may be fined not less than $100 nor more than $500 or imprisoned for not more than 3 months, or both, for a first offense and may be fined not less than $500 nor more than $1,000 or imprisoned for not less than 6 months nor more than one year, or both, for each subsequent offense.AB554,2Section 2. Effective date.(1) This act takes effect on January 1, 2027. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab554 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab554 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB554 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB554 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB554: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting